Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1005
Write-in vote; when valid.

If the last name or a reasonably close spelling of the last name of a person engaged in or pursuing a write-in campaign pursuant to section 32-615 or 32-633 is written or printed on a line provided for that purpose and the square or oval opposite such line has been marked with a cross or other clear, intelligible mark, the vote shall be valid and the ballot shall be counted except as provided in section 32-1007. A write-in vote for a person who is not engaged in or pursuing a write-in campaign pursuant to section 32-615 or 32-633 shall not be counted.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 299;

Laws 1999, LB 571, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 31;

Laws 2013, LB349, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB285, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 66.